Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB936.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 154.32-010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) "Activation date" means the date established in the tax incentive agreement that is
within two (2) years of final approval;
(2) "Affiliate" means the following:
(a) Members of a family, including only brothers and sisters of the whole or half
blood, spouse, ancestors, and lineal descendants of an individual;
(b) An individual, and a corporation more than fifty percent (50%) in value of the
outstanding stock of which is owned, directly or indirectly, by or for that
individual;
(c) An individual, and a limited liability company of which more than fifty
percent (50%) of the capital interest or profits are owned or controlled,
directly or indirectly, by or for that individual;
(d) Two (2) corporations which are members of the same controlled group, which
includes and is limited to:
1. One (1) or more chains of corporations connected through stock
ownership with a common parent corporation if:
a. Stock possessing more than fifty percent (50%) of the total
combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote or
more than fifty percent (50%) of the total value of shares of all
classes of stock of each of the corporations, except the common
parent corporation, is owned by one (1) or more of the other
corporations; and
b. The common parent corporation owns stock possessing more than
fifty percent (50%) of the total combined voting power of all
classes of stock entitled to vote or more than fifty percent (50%) of
Page 1 of 12
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2515
the total value of shares of all classes of stock of at least one (1) of
the other corporations, excluding, in computing the voting power
or value, stock owned directly by the other corporations; or
2. Two (2) or more corporations if five (5) or fewer persons who are
individuals, estates, or trusts own stock possessing more than fifty
percent (50%) of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock
entitled to vote or more than fifty percent (50%) of the total value of
shares of all classes of stock of each corporation, taking into account the
stock ownership of each person only to the extent the stock ownership is
identical with respect to each corporation;
(e) A grantor and a fiduciary of any trust;
(f) A fiduciary of a trust and a fiduciary of another trust, if the same person is a
grantor of both trusts;
(g) A fiduciary of a trust and a beneficiary of that trust;
(h) A fiduciary of a trust and a beneficiary of another trust, if the same person is a
grantor of both trusts;
(i) A fiduciary of a trust and a corporation more than fifty percent (50%) in value
of the outstanding stock of which is owned, directly or indirectly, by or for the
trust or by or for a person who is a grantor of the trust;
(j) A fiduciary of a trust and a limited liability company more than fifty percent
(50%) of the capital interest, or the interest in profits, of which is owned
directly or indirectly, by or for the trust or by or for a person who is a grantor
of the trust;
(k) A corporation, a partnership, or a limited partnership if the same persons own:
1. More than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of the
corporation; and
2. More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest, or the profits
Page 2 of 12
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2515
interest, in the partnership or limited partnership;
(l) A corporation and a limited liability company if the same persons own:
1. More than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of the
corporation; and
2. More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or the profits in the
limited liability company;
(m) A partnership or limited partnership and a limited liability company if the
same persons own:
1. More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or profits in the
partnership or limited partnership; and
2. More than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or the profits in the
limited liability company;
(n) An S corporation and another S corporation if the same persons own more
than fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of each corporation;
S corporation designation being the same as that designation under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(o) An S corporation and a C corporation, if the same persons own more than
fifty percent (50%) in value of the outstanding stock of each corporation; S
and C corporation designations being the same as those designations under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; or
(p) Two (2) or more limited liability companies, if the same persons own more
than fifty percent (50%) of the capital interest or are entitled to more than fifty
percent (50%) of the capital profits in the limited liability companies;
(3) "Agribusiness" means the processing of raw agricultural products, including but not
limited to timber and industrial hemp, or the performance of value-added functions
with regard to raw agricultural products;
(4) "Alternative fuel production" means a Kentucky operation that primarily produces
Page 3 of 12
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2515
alternative transportation fuels for sale. The alternative fuel production may
produce electricity as a by-product if the primary function of the operations remains
the production and sale of alternative transportation fuels;
(5) "Alternative transportation fuels" has the same meaning as in KRS 152.715;
(6) "Approved company" means an eligible company that has received final approval
to receive incentives under this subchapter;
(7) "Approved costs" means the amount of eligible costs approved by the authority at
final approval;
(8) "Authority" means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority
established by KRS 154.20-010;
(9) "Biomass resources" has the same meaning as in KRS 152.715;
(10) "Capital lease" means a lease classified as a capital lease by the Statement of
Financial Accounting Standards No. 13, Accounting for Leases, issued by the
Financial Accounting Standards Board, November 1976, as amended;
(11) "Carbon dioxide or hydrogen transmission pipeline" means the in-state portion of a
pipeline, including appurtenant facilities, property rights, and easements, that is
used exclusively for the purpose of transporting carbon dioxide or hydrogen to the
point of sale, storage, or other carbon or hydrogen management applications;
(12) "Coal severing and processing" means activities resulting in the eligible company
being subject to the tax imposed by KRS Chapter 143;
(13) "Commonwealth" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(14) "Confirmed approved costs" means:
(a) For owned economic development projects, the documented eligible costs
incurred on or before the activation date; or
(b) For leased economic development projects:
1. The documented eligible costs incurred on or before the activation date;
and
Page 4 of 12
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2515
2. Estimated rent to be incurred by the approved company throughout the
term of the tax incentive agreement.
For both owned and leased economic development projects, "confirmed approved
costs" may be less than approved costs, but shall not be more than approved costs;
(15) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(16) "Economic development project" means:
(a) The acquisition, leasing, or construction of a new facility;
(b) The acquisition, leasing, rehabilitation, or expansion of an existing facility; or
(c) The installation and equipping of a facility;
by an eligible company. "Economic development project" does not include any
economic development project that will result in the replacement of facilities
existing in the Commonwealth, except as provided in KRS 154.32-060;
(17) (a) "Eligible company" means any corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust, or any
other entity with a proposed economic development project that is engaged in
or is planning to be engaged in one (1) or more of the following activities
within the Commonwealth:
1. Manufacturing;
2. Agribusiness;
3. Nonretail service or technology;
4. Headquarters operations, regardless of the underlying business activity
of the company;
5. Alternative fuel, gasification, energy-efficient alternative fuel, or
renewable energy production;
6. Carbon dioxide or hydrogen transmission pipeline;
7. Coal severing and processing; or
8. Hospital operations.
Page 5 of 12
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2515
(b) "Eligible company" does not include companies where the primary activity to
be conducted within the Commonwealth is forestry, fishing, the provision of
utilities, construction, wholesale trade, retail trade, real estate, rental and
leasing, educational services, accommodation and food services, or public
administration services;
(18) "Eligible costs" means:
(a) For owned economic development projects:
1. Start-up costs;
2. Nonrecurring obligations incurred for labor and nonrecurring payments
to contractors, subcontractors, builders, and materialmen in connection
with the economic development project;
3. The cost of acquiring land or rights in land and any cost incidental
thereto, including recording fees;
4. The cost of contract bonds and of insurance of all kinds that may be
required or necessary for completion of an economic development
project which is not paid by a contractor or otherwise provided for;
5. All costs of architectural and engineering services, including test
borings, surveys, estimated plans and specifications, preliminary
investigations, and supervision of construction, as well as for the
performance of all the duties required for construction of the economic
development project;
6. All costs which are required to be paid under the terms of any contract
for the economic development project;
7. All costs incurred for construction activities, including site tests and
inspections; subsurface site work; excavation; removal of structures,
roadways, cemeteries, and other surface obstructions; filling, grading,
and providing drainage and storm water retention; installation of utilities
Page 6 of 12
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2515
such as water, sewer, sewage treatment, gas, electric, communications,
and similar facilities; off-site construction of utility extensions to the
boundaries of the real estate; construction and installation of railroad
spurs as needed to connect the economic development project to existing
railways; or similar activities as the authority may determine necessary
for construction of the economic development project; and
8. All other costs of a nature comparable to those described in this
paragraph,[above] including but not limited to investments in:
a. Laboratory equipment;
b. Computer servers;
c. Software;
d. Capitalized leases; and
e. Leasehold improvements;
when the costs are integral to the operation of research and
development, headquarters, high-technology operations, or service
sector facilities; and
(b) For leased economic development projects:
1. Start-up costs;
2. Building/leasehold improvements;[ and]
3. Fifty percent (50%) of the estimated annual rent for each year of the tax
incentive agreement; and
4. Investments in:
a. Laboratory equipment;
b. Computer servers;
c. Software; and
d. Capitalized leases;
when the costs are directly related to the establishment or expansion of
Page 7 of 12
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2515
research and development, headquarters, high-technology operations,
or service sector facilities.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, for economic development
projects that are not in enhanced incentive counties, the cost of equipment eligible
for recovery as an eligible cost shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000)
for each new full-time job created as of the activation date;
(19) "Employee benefits" means payments by an approved company for its full-time
employees for health insurance, life insurance, dental insurance, vision insurance,
defined benefits, 401(k), or similar plans;
(20) "Energy-efficient alternative fuel production" means a Kentucky operation that
produces for sale energy-efficient alternative fuels;
(21) "Energy-efficient alternative fuels" means homogeneous fuels that:
(a) Are produced from processes designed to densify feedstock coal, waste coal,
or biomass resources; and
(b) Have an energy content that is greater than the feedstock coal, waste coal, or
biomass resource;
(22) "Enhanced incentive counties" means counties certified by the authority pursuant to
KRS 154.32-050;
(23) "Final approval" means the action taken by the authority authorizing the eligible
company to receive incentives under this subchapter;
(24) (a) "Full-time job" means a job held by a person who:
1. Is required to work a minimum of thirty-five (35) hours per week; and
2. a. Is subject to the Kentucky individual income tax imposed by KRS
141.020; or
b. Works remotely away from the economic development project if
the job meets all of the following conditions:
i. Is held by a Kentucky resident;
Page 8 of 12
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2515
ii. Was created as a result of the economic development project;
and
iii. The payroll of this job is expensed to the economic
development project.
(b) "Full-time job" does not include a job held by a resident of any state with a
reciprocal agreement between the Commonwealth and the other state as
described in KRS 141.070;
(25) "Gasification process" means a process that converts any carbon-containing
material into a synthesis gas composed primarily of carbon monoxide and
hydrogen;
(26) "Gasification production" means a Kentucky operation that primarily produces for
sale:
(a) Alternative transportation fuels;
(b) Synthetic natural gas;
(c) Chemicals;
(d) Chemical feedstocks; or
(e) Liquid fuels;
from coal, waste coal, coal-processing waste, or biomass resources, through a
gasification process. The gasification production may produce electricity as a by-
product if the primary function of the operations remains the production and sale of
alternative transportation fuels, synthetic natural gas, chemicals, chemical
feedstocks, or liquid fuels;
(27) "Headquarters" means the principal office where the principal executives of the
entity are located and from which other personnel, branches, affiliates, offices, or
entities are controlled;
(28) "Hospital" means a facility licensed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services
under KRS Chapter 216B for the operation of a hospital and the basic services
Page 9 of 12
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2515
provided by a hospital;
(29) "Incentives" means the incentives available under this subchapter, as listed in KRS
154.32-020(3);
(30) "Job target" means the annual average number of new full-time jobs that the
approved company commits to create and maintain at the economic development
project, which shall not be less than ten (10) new full-time jobs;
(31) "Kentucky gross receipts" has the same meaning as in KRS 141.0401;
(32) "Kentucky gross profits" has the same meaning as in KRS 141.0401;
(33) "Lease agreement" means an agreement between an approved company and an
unrelated entity conveying the right to use a facility, the terms of which reflect an
arms' length transaction. "Lease agreement" does not include a capital lease;
(34) "Leased project" means an economic development project site occupied by an
approved company pursuant to a lease agreement;
(35) "Manufacturing" means any activity involving:
(a) Processing, assembling, or production of any property, including the
processing resulting in a change in the conditions of the property and any
activity related to the processing, assembling, or production of property,
together with the storage, warehousing, distribution, and related office
facilities; or
(b) Production of vital medications, personal protective equipment, or equipment
necessary to produce personal protective equipment;
(36) (a) "Nonretail service or technology" means any activity where service or
technology is provided predominantly outside the Commonwealth and
designed to serve a multistate, national, or international market.
(b) "Nonretail service or technology" includes but is not limited to call centers,
centralized administrative or processing centers, telephone or Internet sales
order or processing centers, distribution or fulfillment centers, data processing
Page 10 of 12
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2515
centers, research and development facilities, and other similar activities;
(37) "Owned project" means an economic development project owned in fee simple by
the approved company or an affiliate, or possessed by the approved company or an
affiliate pursuant to a capital lease;
(38) "Personal protective equipment" means protective clothing, helmets, gloves, face
shields, goggles, face masks, respirators, and other equipment designed to protect
the user from injury or the spread of infection or illness;
(39) "Preliminary approval" means the action taken by the authority preliminarily
approving an eligible company for incentives under this subchapter;
(40) "Renewable energy production" means a Kentucky operation that utilizes wind
power, biomass resources, landfill methane gas, hydropower, solar power, or other
similar renewable resources to generate electricity for sale to unrelated entities;
(41) "Rent" means the actual annual rent or fee paid by an approved company under a
lease agreement;
(42) "Start-up costs" means nonrecurring costs incurred to furnish and equip a facility
for an economic development project, including costs incurred for:
(a) Computers, furnishings, office equipment, manufacturing equipment, and
fixtures;
(b) The relocation of out-of-state equipment;[ and]
(c) Cost of fixed telecommunications equipment; and
(d) Investments in:
1. Laboratory equipment;
2. Computer servers;
3. Software;
4. Capitalized leases; and
5. Leasehold improvements;
when the costs are necessary to accommodate research and development,
Page 11 of 12
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2515
headquarters, high-technology operations, or service sector facilities;
as certified to the authority in accordance with KRS 154.32-030;
(43) "Synthetic natural gas" means the same thing as in KRS 152.715;
(44) "Tax incentive agreement" means the agreement entered into pursuant to KRS
154.32-040 between the authority and an approved company;
(45) "Term" means the period of time for which a tax incentive agreement may be in
effect, which shall not exceed fifteen (15) years for an economic development
project located in an enhanced incentive county, or ten (10) years for an economic
development project not located in any other county;
(46) "Vital medications" means any drug or biologic used to prevent or treat a serious
life-threatening disease or medical condition for which there is no other available
source with sufficient supply of that drug or biologic or alternative drug or biologic;
(47) "Wage" means the per hour earnings of a full-time employee, including wages, tips,
overtime, bonuses, and commissions, as reflected on the employee's federal form
W-2 wage and tax statement, but excludes employee benefits; and
(48) "Wage target" means the average total hourly compensation amount, including the
minimum wage and employee benefits, that the approved company commits to
meet for all new full-time jobs created and maintained as a result of the economic
development project, which shall not be less than:
(a) One hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the federal minimum wage in
enhanced incentive counties; or
(b) One hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage in all other
counties.
Page 12 of 12
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:49 PM Jacketed